Massachusetts, session 194th, H2144.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 151A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following new section:-
Section 75. For the purpose of this section, the term “development” shall mean a private
residential dwelling in excess of 10 units or a retail, commercial or industrial development in
excess of 5,000 square feet.
For any private development that is in excess of $750,000, each employer shall post in a
conspicuous location at the job site a certificate of compliance issued by the department showing
that it is registered with the department and current in its obligations relating to contributions,
of 2

payments in lieu of contributions, and the employer medical assistance contribution established
in Section 189 of Chapter 149.
SECTION 2. Chapter 152 is hereby amended by adding the following new section:-
Section 87. For the purpose of this section, the term “development” shall mean a private
residential dwelling in excess of 10 units or a retail, commercial or industrial development in
excess of 5,000 square feet.
For any private development that is in excess of $750,000, each employer shall post in a
conspicuous location at the job site a notice providing the names and contact information for its
workers’ compensation carrier and agent and that it is current in its obligations relating to proof
of coverage verification.
SECTION 3. Chapter 149 is hereby amended by adding the following new section:-
Section 27B1/2. For the purpose of this section, the term “development” shall mean a
private residential dwelling in excess of 10 units or a retail, commercial or industrial
development in excess of 5,000 square feet.
For any private development that is in excess of $750,000, each employer shall ensure
that each person performing services on their behalf on the job site completes the appropriate
entries in a sign in-out log. The sign in-out log shall include the location of the project, current
date, printed name, signature, Massachusetts trade license number, where applicable, and the
time of each entry or exit. Every contractor or subcontractor shall furnish, upon request, a true
and accurate record of all persons performing services on a job site for inspection by the
Attorney General or her designee.
of 2